Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 18.64 RCW to read as follows:(1) A pharmacy in a physical location that dispenses continuous glucose monitoring equipment shall maintain a sufficient supply of monitoring sensors to enable the pharmacy to provide a same-day replacement sensor to a patient who experiences an equipment malfunction or an emergency that necessitates an additional sensor to be dispensed.(2) A mail-order pharmacy that dispenses continuous glucose monitoring equipment shall maintain a sufficient supply of monitoring sensors to enable the pharmacy to promptly provide a replacement sensor to a patient who experiences an equipment malfunction or an emergency that necessitates an additional sensor to be dispensed. For purposes of this subsection, "promptly" means mailing a replacement sensor to the patient no later than the next business day or, if mailing the replacement by the next business day is not possible, as soon as practicable.--- END ---